Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 30,000 FEET.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to 30,000 Feet, a nonprofit organization, to help youth and community artists further develop their artistic skills, to create community art and artistic performances, and to promote and share African American history and culture through the arts. new text end